Utah statutes.
26-5-3.   System for detecting and monitoring diseases established by department.

(1)  The department shall develop and maintain a system for detecting and monitoring chronic diseases within the state and shall investigate and determine the epidemiology of those conditions which contributed to preventable and premature sickness, or both, and to death and disability.

(2)  Beginning July 1, 2004, the department shall consider the disease known as "lupus" a chronic disease subject to the detection and monitoring provisions of Subsection (1).



Amended by Chapter 197, 2004 General Session

